North Carolina, session 2025, HB1155.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article XIII of the Constitution of North Carolina is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 5. Initiative.
(1) Procedure for proposal. The people may initiate a referendum on a proposed
amendment to the Constitution by presenting to the State Board of Elections a petition that sets
forth the text of the proposed amendment to the Constitution and is certified to have been signed
by qualified voters not less in number than eight percent (8%) of the votes for all candidates for
Governor at the last gubernatorial election with no less than three percent (3%) of such signatures
from each congressional district. The petition shall ask that it be submitted to the qualified voters
and shall make clear to anyone signing the petition the effect of the proposed amendments.
(2) Registration. A petition must be registered with the State Board of Elections prior to
circulation, and no signature shall be valid unless submitted to the State Board of Elections within
one year after the date of registration.
(3) Submission to voters. The State Board of Elections shall submit the proposed
constitutional amendment to the qualified voters of the State at the next statewide general election
held not less than 180 days from the date of certification by the State Board of Elections that the
petition is valid. The submission shall accurately reflect the effect of the proposed amendments
*H1155-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
as set forth in the petition and the full text of the amendment shall be provided with any ballot
by which a vote may be cast.
(4) Restricted subjects. No initiative measure may change the provisions of this
subsection. No initiative measure defeated under this Section may be considered again under this
Section until five years from the date of the election have elapsed.
(5) Effectiveness; effective date. An initiative to be effective must be approved by sixty
percent (60%) of the qualified voters voting in the election thereon. An initiative takes effect on
the first day of January after the election, unless the proposed amendment provides a different
effective date.
(6) Implementation. The General Assembly shall provide by general law the manner and
timing for which petitions shall be circulated, verified, presented, and certified and the manner
in which measures are submitted to the qualified voters. The State Board of Elections shall make
all necessary determinations regarding the petition within 30 working days of submission of the
signatures required by this Section, which shall be tolled for any period of time that is within 10
working days before or after an election. A determination of the State Board of Elections may be
appealed as of right to the Court of Appeals. Written appeal shall be taken within two business
days after the determination of the State Board of Elections.
(7) Unseverability. If any part of this Section is held invalid or unenforceable by any
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire Section is repealed."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3, 2026,
which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that time.
The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment giving the people the power of initiative to adopt or reject
amendments to the Constitution."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment
among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the question are against
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1155-First Edition